Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
The amounts authorized, as provided by ORS 286A.035, for  issuance of gen-
eral obligation bonds of the state during the 2023-2025 biennium are as follows:
GENERAL OBLIGATION BONDS
General Fund Obligations
(1) Higher Education Coordinating
Commission (Art. XI-G):
(a) Chemeketa Community
College, Building 7 Remodel ... $ 8,110,000
(b) Klamath Community College,
Childcare Resource Learning
Center..................................... $ 1,535,000
(c) Rogue Community College,
Transportation Technology
Center..................................... $ 7,105,000
(d) Central Oregon Community
College, Renovation and
Expansion of CTE Facilities
at Redmond Campus ............... $ 4,050,000
(e) Clatsop Community College,
Maritime Science Building...... $ 8,010,000
(f) Oregon Coast Community
College, Center for Trades
Education................................ $ 8,110,000
(g) Columbia Gorge Community
College, Campus Renovations
for Student Safety and
Success .................................. $ 5,595,000
(h) Lane Community College,
Science, Mathematics and
Engineering Building
Enrolled House Bill 5005 (HB 5005-A) Page 1
Renovation.............................. $ 8,110,000
(i) Portland Community College,
Rock Creek Campus Building
Complex - Phase I .................. $ 8,110,000
(j) Southwestern Oregon Community
College, Student Uplift and
Collaboration Create Expanded
Support and Success ............... $ 8,110,000
(k) Umpqua Community College,
Welcome Center and Medical
Careers Training Hub ............. $ 8,110,000
(L) University of Oregon,
Friendly Hall Renovation........ $ 7,650,000
(m) Oregon State University,
Collaborative Innovation
Complex.................................. $ 72,680,000
(n) Portland State University,
Vernier Science Center and
Gateway Art and Design
Project Completions................ $ 4,330,000
(2) Department of Environmental
Quality (Art. XI-H) ................. $ 10,333,333
(3) Oregon Business Development
Department (Art. XI-M) ......... $ 100,885,000
(4) Oregon Business Development
Department (Art. XI-N) .......... $ 50,570,000
(5) Department of Education
(Art. XI-P) .............................. $ 100,885,000
(6) Oregon Department of
Administrative
Services (Art. XI-Q):
(a) Oregon Military Department:
(A) Salem Owen Summers Building
Service Life Extension ............ $ 2,955,000
(B) Salem Owen Summers Building
Seismic Strengthening and
Life Safety Improvements ...... $ 5,595,000
(b) Department of State Police:
(A) Central Point Office
Expansion ............................... $ 26,845,000
(B) Springfield Forensic Lab and
Medical Examiner’s Office ...... $ 21,545,000
(C) Springfield Patrol Area
Command Office ..................... $ 7,385,000
(c) Department of Corrections:
(A) Camera System ....................... $ 8,615,000
(B) Capital Improvement and
Renewal .................................. $ 50,570,000
(C) Wireless Communication
System .................................... $ 13,070,000
(d) Oregon Youth Authority:
(A) Camp Riverbend Dorm
Enrolled House Bill 5005 (HB 5005-A) Page 2
Renovation.............................. $ 5,455,000
(B) Capital Improvements -
All Facilities ........................... $ 11,795,000
(C) Control Room Renovations ..... $ 330,000
(D) JJIS IT System
Modernization......................... $ 7,850,000
(E) MacLaren West Cottages
Renovations ............................ $ 11,425,000
(F) Rogue Valley Facility
Improvements......................... $ 1,509,910
(G) Tillamook Dorm Renovation ... $ 8,420,000
(e) Department of Education,
Oregon School for the Deaf
Capital Improvements ............ $ 3,550,000
(f) State Forestry Department:
(A) Capital Improvements ............ $ 2,461,687
(B) Toledo Facility Replacement,
Phase II .................................. $ 1,134,135
(C) Multi-Mission Aircraft ............ $ 7,444,980
(D) Salem Airport Hangar ............ $ 1,248,480
(g) State Department of Fish
and Wildlife, Capital
Improvement and Renewal ..... $ 2,540,000
(h) Housing and Community
Services Department, Local
Innovation and Fast Track
(LIFT)/Permanent Supportive
Housing Programs .................. $ 604,280,000
(i) Higher Education
Coordinating Commission:
(A) Public Universities Capital
Improvement and Renewal ..... $ 100,885,000
(B) FAMIS System Replacement,
Phase II .................................. $ 5,095,000
(C) University of Oregon,
Friendly Hall Renovation........ $ 65,840,000
(D) Portland State University,
Vernier Science Center and
Gateway Art and Design Project
Completions............................ $ 53,175,000
(E) Oregon Institute of
Technology, Geothermal System
Emergency Renovation ........... $ 18,160,000
(j) Oregon Health Authority:
(A) Junction City Single
Unit Remodel .......................... $ 5,095,000
(B) PLC System Replacement ....... $ 3,045,000
(k) Department of Revenue,
Electronic Valuation
Information System ................ $ 14,265,000
(L) Legislative Administration
Committee, Capitol
Enrolled House Bill 5005 (HB 5005-A) Page 3
Accessibility, Maintenance
and Safety Phase III ............... $ 216,920,000
(m) Judicial Department:
(A) Benton County Courthouse .... $ 8,950,000
(B) Clackamas County
 Courthouse ............................ $ 30,365,000
(C) Morrow County Courthouse ... $ 12,745,000
(D) Curry County Courthouse ...... $ 10,760,000
(7) Department of
Transportation (Art. XI,
section 7), Interstate 5
Bridge Replacement Project ... $ 251,825,000
Dedicated Fund Obligations
(8) Department of Veterans’
Affairs (Art. XI-A) .................. $ 109,023,670
(9) Higher Education Coordinating
Commission (Art. XI-F(1)):
(a) Portland State University,
Smith Memorial Union ........... $ 8,315,000
(b) Portland State University,
Vernier Science Center and
Gateway Art and Design Project
Completions............................ $ 16,190,000
(10) Department of Environmental
Quality (Art. XI-H) ................. $ 20,000,000
(11) Housing and Community
Services Department
(Art. XI-I(2)) ........................... $ 50,000,000
(12) Oregon Department of
Administrative Services
(Art. XI-Q):
(a) Yellow Parking Lot Paving ..... $ 4,050,000
(b) State Forestry Department:
(A) Capital Improvements ............ $ 2,418,313
(B) Toledo Facility Replacement,
Phase II .................................. $ 1,575,865
(C) Multi-Mission Aircraft ............ $ 4,720,020
(D) Salem Airport Hangar ............ $ 791,520
(c) Department of Justice,
Legal Tools Replacement
System 3.0 ............................... $ 21,520,000
(d) Oregon Liquor and Cannabis
Commission:
(A) Liquor Warehouse Conveyor
System .................................... $ 15,185,000
(B) Liquor Warehouse Land
and Building............................ $ 55,515,000
(C) Liquor Warehouse
Management IT System .......... $ 16,695,000
Total General Obligation
Bonds...................................... $2,351,436,913
Enrolled House Bill 5005 (HB 5005-A) Page 4
SECTION 2. The amounts authorized, as provided  by ORS 286A.035, for issuance of re-
venue bonds of the state during the 2023-2025 biennium are as follows:
REVENUE BONDS
Direct Revenue Bonds
Housing and Community
Services Department ............. $ 500,000,000
Department of Transportation,
Highway User Tax ................. $ 360,000,000
Department of Transportation,
Grant Anticipation Revenue
Vehicle .................................. $ 300,000,000
Oregon Business Development
Department ........................... $ 30,000,000
Oregon Department of
Administrative Services,
Lottery Revenue Bonds ........ $ 501,100,000
Total Direct Revenue
Bonds ....................................  $ 1,691,100,000
Pass-Through Revenue Bonds
Oregon Business Development
Department, Industrial
Development Bonds............... $ 600,000,000
Oregon Business Development
Department, Beginning and
Expanding Farmer Loan
Program ................................ $ 2,000,000
Oregon Facilities Authority .. $ 1,000,000,000
Housing and Community
Services Department.............  $ 1,300,000,000
Total Pass-Through Revenue
Bonds ....................................  $ 2,902,000,000
Total Revenue Bonds .................... $ 4,593,100,000
SECTION 3. The amount authorized, as  provided by ORS 286A.035, for issuance of cer-
tificates of participation and other financing agreements  of the state during the 2023-2025
biennium for the Oregon Department of Administrative Services is $100,000,000.
SECTION 4. (1) For calendar year 2024, the amount of $509,538,600  is allocated for private
activity bonds, as provided in ORS 286A.615, as follows:
(a) Oregon Business Development
Department, Beginning and
Expanding Farmer Loan
Program .................................... $ 1,000,000
(b) Housing and Community
Services Department ................. $450,000,000
(c) Private Activity Bond
Committee................................. $ 58,538,600
(2) For calendar  year 2025, the amount of $509,538,600 is allocated for private activity
bonds, as provided in ORS 286A.615, as follows:
(a) Oregon Business Development
Department, Beginning and
Expanding Farmer Loan
Program .................................... $ 1,000,000
Enrolled House Bill 5005 (HB 5005-A) Page 5
(b) Housing and Community
Services Department ................. $450,000,000
(c) Private Activity Bond
Committee................................. $ 58,538,600
(3) If an increase in this state’s population, a sufficient increase in the Consumer Price
Index or a change in federal law allows the private activity bond limit  as set by the Internal
Revenue Code of 1986, as amended, to exceed $509,538,600 during  the 2024 calendar year or
$509,538,600 during the 2025 calendar year, the increase is allocated to the Private Activity
Bond Committee.
SECTION 5. In addition to and not in lieu of any  authorization to issue general obligation
bonds under ORS 286A.035, in the biennium beginning July 1, 2025, at the request of the  De-
partment of Transportation, the State Treasurer may issue general obligation  bonds au-
thorized under Article XI, section 7, of the Oregon Constitution, in an amount that produces
$250,000,000 of net proceeds for the Interstate 5  bridge replacement project, plus an amount
estimated by the State Treasurer to pay bond-related costs.
SECTION 6.
In addition to and not in lieu of any  authorization to issue general obligation
bonds under ORS 286A.035, in the biennium beginning July 1, 2027, at the request of the De-
partment of Transportation,  the State Treasurer may issue general obligation bonds au-
thorized under Article XI, section 7, of the Oregon Constitution, in an amount that produces
$250,000,000 of net proceeds for the Interstate  5 bridge replacement project, plus an amount
estimated by the State Treasurer to pay bond-related costs.
SECTION 7.
In addition to and not in lieu of any  authorization to issue general obligation
bonds under ORS 286A.035, in the biennium beginning July 1, 2029, at the request of the  De-
partment of Transportation, the State Treasurer may issue general obligation  bonds au-
thorized under Article XI, section 7, of the Oregon Constitution, in an amount that produces
$250,000,000 of net proceeds for the Interstate 5  bridge replacement project, plus an amount
estimated by the State Treasurer to pay bond-related costs.
SECTION 8.
(1) For purposes of Article XI-F(1), section 1, of  the Oregon Constitution,
the Legislative Assembly determines that the projects  authorized to be financed pursuant to
section 1 (9) of this 2023 Act with bonds issued under Article XI-F(1) of the Oregon  Consti-
tution will benefit higher education institutions or activities.
(2) For purposes of Article  XI-G, section 1, of the Oregon Constitution, the Legislative
Assembly determines that the projects authorized  to be financed pursuant to section 1 (1)
of this 2023 Act  with bonds issued under Article XI-G of the Oregon Constitution will benefit
higher education institutions or activities or community colleges authorized by law to receive
state aid.
SECTION 9.
Bonds authorized pursuant to  Article XI-G of the Oregon Constitution under
section 1 (1) of this 2023 Act for the benefit of a constructing  authority may not be issued
until the constructing authority certifies  that the constructing authority has matching funds
available for the same or similar purposes as the bonds, that the matching  funds are not
proceeds of indebtedness incurred by the state under any other article of the Oregon Con-
stitution, and that the matching funds are available  to the constructing authority in an
amount at least equal to the amount of indebtedness incurred by  the state through the is-
suance of the bonds.
SECTION 10.
(1) Out of the amount  specified in section 1 (6)(m)(A) of this 2023 Act, the
State Treasurer may issue  Article XI-Q bonds in an amount not to exceed $8,831,894 of net
proceeds for the purposes and in the manner  specified in section 8, chapter 705, Oregon Laws
2013, plus an amount estimated by the State Treasurer to pay estimated bond-related costs.
(2) Out of the amount specified in section 1 (6)(m)(B) of this  2023 Act, the State Treas-
urer may issue Article XI-Q bonds in an amount not to  exceed $30,000,000 of net proceeds for
the purposes and in the manner specified in  section 8, chapter 705, Oregon Laws 2013, plus
an amount estimated by the State Treasurer to pay estimated bond-related costs.
Enrolled House Bill 5005 (HB 5005-A) Page 6
(3) Out of the amount specified in section 1 (6)(m)(C)  of this 2023 Act, the State Treas-
urer may issue Article XI-Q bonds in an amount not to  exceed $12,575,000 of net proceeds for
the purposes and in the manner specified in  section 8, chapter 705, Oregon Laws 2013, plus
an amount estimated by the State Treasurer to pay estimated bond-related costs.
(4) Out of the amount  specified in section 1 (6)(m)(D) of this 2023 Act, the State Treas-
urer may issue Article XI-Q bonds in an amount not to  exceed $10,600,000 of net proceeds for
the purposes and in the manner specified in section  8, chapter 705, Oregon Laws 2013, plus
an amount estimated by the State Treasurer to pay estimated bond-related costs.
(5) For  purposes of sections 8 and 9, chapter 705, Oregon Laws 2013, and section 64,
chapter 723, Oregon Laws 2013, bonds issued pursuant to this section  are considered to be
bonds issued pursuant to section 8, chapter 705, Oregon Laws 2013.
(6) Bonds may not be issued pursuant to section 1 (6)(m)(A), (B), (C) or (D) of this  2023
Act except as provided in this section.
SECTION 11. (1) A public university that is carrying out a qualified project shall require
each contractor in a contract with an estimated cost of $200,000 or greater to:
(a) Employ apprentices to perform 15  percent of the work hours that workers in
apprenticeable occupations perform under  the contract, in a manner consistent with the
apprentices’ respective apprenticeship training programs;
(b) Establish and  execute a plan for outreach, recruitment and retention of women, mi-
nority individuals and veterans to perform work under the contract, with the aspirational
target of having at least 15 percent of total  work hours performed by individuals in one or
more of those groups;
(c) Provide health insurance and retirement benefits to workers; and
(d) Require any subcontractor engaged by  the contractor to abide by the requirements
set forth in paragraphs (a), (b) and (c) of this subsection, if the work  to be performed under
the subcontract has an estimated cost of $200,000 or greater.
(2) On or before February 1 of each year, each public university that is carrying out  a
qualified project shall  report to the Joint Committee on Ways and Means or Joint Interim
Committee on Ways and Means, as part of the report required under ORS 350.379, on:
(a) The amount of work performed on qualified projects by apprentices;
(b) The amount of work performed on qualified projects by women,  minority individuals
and veterans; and
(c) The types and  costs of health insurance and retirement benefits provided to workers
by contractors and subcontractors.
(3) The requirements of this section are in addition to, and  not in lieu of, the require-
ments imposed under ORS 350.379.
(4) As used in this section:
(a) “Apprentice” has the meaning given that term in ORS 660.010.
(b) “Apprenticeable occupation” has the meaning given that term in ORS 660.010.
(c) “Apprenticeship training program”  means the total system of apprenticeship that a
particular local joint committee, as defined in ORS 660.010, operates, including the local joint
committee’s registered standards  and all other terms and conditions for qualifying, recruit-
ing, selecting, employing and training apprentices in an apprenticeable occupation.
(d) “Minority individual” has the meaning given that term in ORS 200.005.
(e) “Qualified project” means the following capital construction projects:
(A) The University of Oregon  Friendly Hall renovation referenced in section 1 (1)(L) of
this 2023 Act;
(B) The Oregon State University Collaborative Innovation Complex referenced  in section
1 (1)(m) of this 2023 Act;
(C) The Portland State University Vernier Science Center and Gateway Art  and Design
project completions referenced in section 1 (1)(n) of this 2023 Act; and
Enrolled House Bill 5005 (HB 5005-A) Page 7
(D) The Oregon Institute of Technology geothermal system emergency  renovation refer-
enced in section 1 (6)(i)(E) of this 2023 Act.
(f) “Veteran” has the meaning given that term in ORS 408.225.
(g) “Woman” has the meaning given that term in ORS 200.005.
SECTION 12.
This 2023 Act being necessary for the immediate preservation  of the public
peace, health and safety, an emergency  is declared to exist, and this 2023 Act takes effect
July 1, 2023.
Passed by House June 25, 2023
..................................................................................
Timothy G. Sekerak, Chief Clerk of House
..................................................................................
Dan Rayfield, Speaker of House
Passed by Senate June 25, 2023
..................................................................................
Rob Wagner, President of Senate
Received by Governor:
........................M.,........................................................., 2023
Approved:
........................M.,........................................................., 2023
..................................................................................
Tina Kotek, Governor
Filed in Office of Secretary of State:
........................M.,........................................................., 2023
..................................................................................
Secretary of State
Enrolled House Bill 5005 (HB 5005-A) Page 8